tr: Marker çalışma tipi: Geri tepmeli; Sürgülü; Elektromekanik; Elektropnömatik; Elektronik; Levyeli; Mekanik; Mekanik yarı otomatik; Pompalı; Diğer
bg-BG: Тип механизъм на маркера: Блоубек; Болтов механизъм; Електромеханичен; Електропневматичен; Електронен; Лостов механизъм; Механичен; Механичен полуавтоматичен; Помпов механизъм; Друго
th: ประเภทการทำงานของปืนมาร์คเกอร์: โบลว์แบค; ระบบลูกเลื่อน; ไฟฟ้า-เครื่องกล; ไฟฟ้า-นิวเมติก; อิเล็กทรอนิกส์; คานเหวี่ยง; กลไก; กึ่งอัตโนมัติแบบกลไก; ปั๊มแอ็กชัน; อื่นๆ
nb: Handlingstype for markør: Blow-back; Boltmekanisme; Elektromekanisk; Elektropneumatisk; Elektronisk; Bøylerepeter; Mekanisk; Mekanisk halvautomatisk; Pumpemekanisme; Annet
en: Marker action type: Blow-back; Bolt-action; Electro-mechanical; Electro-pneumatic; Electronic; Lever-action; Mechanical; Mechanical semi-automatic; Pump-action; Other
ro-RO: Tipul de acțiune al markerului: Recul (blow-back); Culisant (bolt-action); Electromecanic; Electropneumatic; Electronic; Cu levier (lever-action); Mecanic; Mecanic semiautomat; Cu pompă (pump-action); Altele
fr: Type d'action du marqueur: Blow-back; À verrou; Électromécanique; Électropneumatique; Électronique; À levier; Mécanique; Semi-automatique mécanique; À pompe; Autre
sv: Typ av mekanism för märkpenna: Blowback; Cylindermekanism; Elektromekanisk; Elektropneumatisk; Elektronisk; Bygelrepeter; Mekanisk; Mekanisk halvautomatisk; Pumprepeter; Annat
pt-PT: Tipo de ação do marcador: Blow-back (recuo); Ferrolho; Eletromecânico; Eletropneumático; Eletrónico; Ação por alavanca; Mecânico; Mecânico semiautomático; Ação por bomba; Outro
de: Makierertypen: Blow-Back; Bolt-Action; Elektromechanisch; Elektropneumatisch; Elektronisch; Unterhebelrepetierer; Mechanisch; Mechanisch halbautomatisch; Pump-Action; Sonstige
ja: マーカーアクションタイプ: ブローバック; ボルトアクション; 電子機械式; 電子空気圧式; 電子式; レバーアクション; 機械式; 機械式セミオート; ポンプアクション; その他
ko: 마커 작동 유형: 블로우백; 볼트 액션; 전기 기계식; 전자 공압식; 전자식; 레버 액션; 기계식; 기계식 반자동; 펌프 액션; 기타
zh-TW: 麥克筆動作類型: 反衝式; 栓式; 機電; 電子氣動; 電子式; 槓桿式; 機械式; 機械半自動; 泵動式; 其他
sk-SK: Typ mechanizmu markéra: Blow-back; Odsuvný záver; Elektromechanický; Elektropneumatický; Elektronický; Pákový; Mechanický; Mechanický poloautomatický; Pumpovací; Iný
hr-HR: Vrsta mehanizma markera: Blow-back; Zatvarač (bolt-action); Elektromehanički; Elektropneumatski; Elektronički; Zatvarač s polugom (lever-action); Mehanički; Mehanički poluautomatski; Potezni (pump-action); Ostalo
ru: Тип действия маркера: Со свободным затвором (Blow-back); С продольно-скользящим затвором; Электромеханический; Электропневматический; Электронный; Рычажного действия; Механический; Механический полуавтоматический; Помповый; Другое
it: Tipo di azione del marcatore: Blow-back; Bolt-action; Elettromeccanica; Elettropneumatica; Elettronica; A leva; Meccanica; Meccanica semiautomatica; A pompa; Altro
hu: Festékfilc működési típusa: Blow-back; Forgó-tolózáras; Elektromechanikus; Elektropneumatikus; Elektronikus; Alsókulcsos; Mechanikus; Mechanikus, félautomata; Pumpás; Egyéb
nl: Actietype marker: Blow-back; Grendelactie; Elektromechanisch; Elektropneumatisch; Elektronisch; Hefboomactie; Mechanisch; Mechanisch halfautomatisch; Pompactie; Anders
sl-SI: Vrsta delovanja markerja: Blow-back (povratni udar); Repetirno; Elektromehansko; Elektropnevmatsko; Elektronsko; Na vzvod; Mehansko; Mehansko polavtomatsko; Potezno (pump-action); Drugo
lt-LT: Žymeklio veikimo tipas: Su atatranka (Blow-back); Spynos mechanizmo; Elektromechaninis; Elektropneumatinis; Elektroninis; Svirtinis; Mechaninis; Mechaninis pusiau automatinis; Pompinis; Kita
fi: Merkkaimen toimintatyyppi : Blowback; Pulttilukko; Sähkömekaaninen; Sähköpneumaattinen; Elektroninen; Vipulukko; Mekaaninen; Mekaaninen puoliautomaattinen; Pumpputoiminen; Muu
es: Tipo de acción del marcador: Retroceso (blow-back); Acción de cerrojo; Electromecánico; Electroneumático; Electrónico; Acción de palanca; Mecánico; Semiautomático mecánico; Acción de bombeo; Otro
el: Τύπος λειτουργίας γραμμοχαράκτη: Blow-back; Bolt-action; Ηλεκτρομηχανικό; Ηλεκτροπνευματικό; Ηλεκτρονικό; Lever-action; Μηχανικό; Μηχανικό ημιαυτόματο; Pump-action; Άλλο
pl: Typ działania znacznika: Blow-back; Czterotaktowy (bolt-action); Elektromechaniczny; Elektropneumatyczny; Elektroniczny; Lever-action; Mechaniczny; Mechaniczny półautomatyczny; Pump-action (pompka); Inne
da: Markørhandlingstype: Blowback; Repeter; Elektromekanisk; Elektropneumatisk; Elektronisk; Bøjlespænder; Mekanisk; Mekanisk halvautomatisk; Pump-action; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de acionamento do marcador: Blow-back; Ação por ferrolho; Eletromecânica; Eletropneumática; Eletrônica; Ação por alavanca; Mecânica; Mecânica semiautomática; Ação de bomba; Outro
vi: Loại cơ chế hoạt động của súng bắn sơn: Blow-back; Nạp đạn bằng khóa nòng; Cơ điện; Khí nén điện; Điện tử; Nạp đạn bằng đòn bẩy; Cơ học; Bán tự động cơ học; Nạp đạn kiểu bơm; Khác
zh-CN: 漆弹枪动作类型: 自由枪机; 栓动; 机电式; 气电式; 电子式; 杠杆式; 机械式; 机械半自动; 泵动式; 其他
cs: Typ akce značky: Blowback; Odsuvný závěr; Elektromechanický; Elektropneumatický; Elektronický; Pákový závěr; Mechanický; Mechanický poloautomatický; Pumpovací; Jiné